Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-811
Chiropractic practitioner; powers and duties.

Chiropractic practitioners shall observe and be subject to all state and municipal laws and regulations relative to the control of contagious and infectious diseases, and all matters pertaining to public health. They shall report to the proper health officers the same as other practitioners. Chiropractic practitioners may sign death certificates. When performing acupuncture, a chiropractor licensed under the Uniform Credentialing Act shall provide the same standard of care to patients as that provided by a person licensed under the Uniform Credentialing Act to practice medicine and surgery, osteopathy, or osteopathic medicine and surgery when such person performs acupuncture.

Laws 1927, c. 167, § 81, p. 475;

C.S.1929, § 71-1106;

R.S.1943, § 71-182;

Laws 1945, c. 164, § 1, p. 529;

Laws 2001, LB 270, § 15;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-182;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 252.